es: Nivel de grosor del hilo dental: Regular; Grueso; Fino; Otros
el: Επίπεδο πάχους οδοντικού νήματος: Κανονική; Παχύ; Λεπτό; Άλλο
nb: Tykkelsenivå for tanntråd: Vanlig; Tykk; Tynn; Annet
de: Zahnseidenstärke: Normal; Dick; Dünn; Sonstiges
hu: A fogselyem vastagsági szintje: Normál; Vastag; Vékony; Egyéb
da: Tandtrådstykkelse: Almindelig; Tyk; Tyndt; Andet
zh-CN: 牙线粗细等级: 普通; 粗; 薄; 其他
nl: Flossdraaddikte: Normaal; Dik; Dun; Andere
th: ระดับความหนาของไหมขัดฟัน: แบบปกติ; หนา; ผมบาง; อื่นๆ
tr: Diş İpi Kalınlığı Seviyesi: Normal; Kalın; İnce; Diğer
en: Dental floss thickness level: Regular; Thick; Thin; Other
pt-BR: Nível de espessura do fio dental: Regular; Encorpado; Ralo; Outro
fr: Niveau d’épaisseur du fil dentaire: Normale; Épais; Fin; Autre
zh-TW: 牙線粗細等級: 一般; 厚; 薄; 其他
hr-HR: Razina debljine zubnog konca: Uobičajeni; Debeo; Tanki; Ostalo
pl: Poziom grubości nici dentystycznej: Zwyczajne; Gruby; Cienki; Inne
sk-SK: Úroveň hrúbky zubnej nite: Bežný; Hustý; Tenký; Iné
sl-SI: Stopnja debeline zobne nitke: Običajno; Debela; Tanka; Drugo
vi: Mức độ dày chỉ nha khoa: Loại thông thường; Dày; Mỏng; Khác
ro-RO: Nivel grosime ață dentară: Obișnuită; Groasă; Subțire; Altele
pt-PT: Nível de espessura do fio dental: Tradicionais; Espesso; Fino; Outro
fi: Hammaslangan paksuustaso: Tavallinen; Paksu; Ohut; Muu
lt-LT: Dantų siūlo storis: Įprasta; Stora; Plona; Kita
ru: Толщина зубной нити: Обычный; Толстый; Тонкий; Другое
ko: 치실 두께: 레귤러; 띡; 얇은; 기타
sv: Tjockleksnivå för tandtråd: Vanligt; Tjockt; Tunt; Övrigt
ja: デンタルフロスの厚さレベル: レギュラー; 厚みのある; 薄い; その他
bg-BG: Ниво на дебелина на конеца за зъби: Обикновен; Дебел; Тънък; Други
it: Spessore del filo interdentale: Regular; Spesso; Sottile; Altro
cs: Tloušťka dentální nitě: Běžná; Silnější; Tenčí; Jiné